Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.205

Violations or infractions—Penalties—Subject to RCW 39.12.055.

A contractor found to have committed an infraction or violation under this chapter for performing work as an unregistered contractor shall, in addition to any penalties under this chapter, be subject to the penalties in RCW 39.12.055.

[ 2008 c 120 s 4.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—2008 c 120: See notes following RCW 18.27.030.